Illinois, session 104th, HB2643.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The General Assembly Operations Act is amended 5by adding Section 25 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 10/25 new)7    Sec. 25. Witness slip tracking. Notwithstanding any rule 8or provision of law to the contrary, all witness slips filed in 9either house of the General Assembly concerning proposed 10legislation during the General Assembly committee hearing 11process shall track along with the legislation for which they 12were filed should such legislation be placed on another bill, 13by amendment, for purposes of legislative action. The General 14Assembly, in consultation with the Legislative Information 15System, shall provide for such witness slip tracking on the 16Illinois General Assembly website. 17    Section 10. The Legislative Information System Act is 18amended by adding Section 5.10 as follows: 19    (25 ILCS 145/5.10 new)20    Sec. 5.10. Witness slip tracking. The System shall provide 21for electronic tracking of all witness slips filed in either   HB2643- 2 -LRB104 09848 SPS 19916 b1house of the General Assembly concerning proposed legislation 2during the General Assembly committee hearing by which the 3witness slips shall track along with the legislation for which 4they were filed should such legislation be placed on another 5bill, by amendment, for purposes of legislative action.